District of Columbia statutes.
2-591

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Open Government Office Act”.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 501
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734